Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-261
Remote participation in annual and
special meetings.

(MBCA
7.09) (a) Shareholders of any class or series may participate in any meeting
of shareholders by means of remote communication to the extent the board of
directors authorizes such participation for such class or series. Participation
by means of remote communication shall be subject to such guidelines and procedures
as the board of directors adopts and shall be in conformity with subsection
(b) of this section.

(b) Shareholders participating
in a shareholders' meeting by means of remote communication shall be deemed
present and may vote at such a meeting if the corporation has implemented
reasonable measures:

(1)
To verify that each person participating remotely is a shareholder; and

(2) To provide such shareholders
a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters
submitted to the shareholders, including an opportunity to communicate and
to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently
with such proceedings.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 61.